Maryland, session 2026, SB0246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–203.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of [7] SEVEN members appointed by the
Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0246*

SENATE BILL 246
(2) Of the [7] SEVEN members, [4] FOUR shall be individuals who do not
have any connection with the management or policy of any facility.
(b) Each member shall be interested in problems of health care.
(c) (1) The term of a member is 4 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by the terms provided
for members of the Commission on July 1, 1982. The terms of those members end as follows:
(i) [2] TWO in 1983;
(ii) [1] ONE in 1984;
(iii) [2] TWO in 1985; and
(iv) [2] TWO in 1986.
(3) At the end of a term, a member [continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies] MAY CONTINUE TO SERVE FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED 6
MONTHS.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term [and until a successor is appointed and qualifies].
(5) A member who serves [2] TWO consecutive full 4–year terms may not
be reappointed for 4 years after completion of those terms.
(6) When appointing a member to fill a vacancy due to the expiration of a
member’s term, the Governor shall give consideration to, and make appointments when
appropriate, that would promote the racial, gender, and geographic diversity of the
Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.